src/fst/orthography/Latn-to-Mong.xfscript
!! Latin-Todo Convert


define ng N G -> ᡊ ;
define otherletters  A -> ᠠ ,
E -> ᡄ ,
I -> ᡅ ,
%0 -> ᡆ ,
V -> ᡇ ,
O -> ᡈ ,
U -> ᡉ ,
N -> ᠨ ,
B -> ᡋ ,
P -> ᠫ ,
H -> ᡍ ,
G -> ᡎ ,
M -> ᠮ ,
L -> ᠯ ,
R -> ᠷ ,
S -> ᠰ ,
%$ -> ᠱ ,
D -> ᡑ ,
T -> ᡐ ,
C -> ᡒ ,
c -> ᡔ ,
Z -> ᡓ ,
j -> ᡚ ,
%:  -> ᡃ ,
%, -> ᠂ ,
%. -> ᠃  ;

read regex [ ng .o. otherletters ] ;
